District of Columbia statutes.
38-2561.12

Rate-setting for nonpublic schools.

(a)

The Mayor, or his or her designee, shall administer and implement a rate-setting process for the payment of tuition and related services to nonpublic special education schools and programs that provide special education and related services to students with disabilities funded by the District of Columbia.

(b)

In establishing fair and reasonable rates, the Mayor, or his or her designee, shall consider a variety of factors, including historical data, the rates established by surrounding jurisdictions, and administrative costs.

(c)

The Mayor, or his or her designee, may adopt the rates established by surrounding jurisdictions and apply those rates to nonpublic special education schools or programs that have already been approved to provide services with public funds by a surrounding jurisdiction.

(d)

A nonpublic special education school or program serving students who are funded by the District government shall enter into a contract with the District government accepting rates set by the Mayor, or his or her designee, except that a contract is not required for a student whose placement has been ordered by a District of Columbia court, a federal court, or a hearing officer pursuant to the IDEA.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-269, § 112, 54 DCR 841
This section is referenced in § 38-2561.11.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 112 of Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-667, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1134).